Utah statutes.
53-11-123.   Notification of local law enforcement.
(1) (a)  A bail enforcement agent or bail recovery agent who is searching for
or planning to apprehend a person shall notify the local law enforcement
agency if the search or apprehension will be conducted in an occupied
structure within that law enforcement agency's jurisdiction.
(b) When possible, notification shall be provided before taking action, but
always within 24 hours of taking action.
(c)  When a bail enforcement agent or bail recovery agent is preparing to
enter an occupied structure to carry out an arrest, he shall verbally advise
the local law enforcement agency of his location and intended action prior to
acting.
(2)  A bail enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, and bail recovery
apprentice shall each carry with him a written document providing proof and
cause for the actions he is taking as a licensee, and shall make the document
available to local law enforcement agencies upon request.
